Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2788.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 38-852.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE38-852.01. Benefits not to be reduced by social security payments From and after the effective date of this section April 29, 1973, all benefits now or hereafter received pursuant to this article or prior retirement systems shall not be reduced because of any payment received as benefits under the federal old age and survivors insurance system. END_STATUTE